California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 certification, or to revoke or suspend licensure to the extent appropriate to ensure consistency and uniformity.

(c) The provider shall have the right to appeal the department’s decision made pursuant to Section 14123.

(d) This section is not applicable to denials of initial certification made pursuant to a moratorium imposed in accordance with Section 14043.46 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 119, Sec. 7.   (SB 91)   Effective July 25, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14574.1.

(a) Every adult day health care center shall be periodically inspected and evaluated for quality of care by a representative or representatives designated by the director, unless otherwise specified in the interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code. Inspections shall be conducted prior to the expiration of certification, but at least every two years, and as often as necessary to ensure the quality of care being provided. As resources permit, an inspection may be conducted prior to, as well as within, the first 90 days of operation.

(b) If, as a result of the inspection, the department or the California Department of Aging, as specified in the interagency agreement, determines that the adult day health care center has serious deficiencies that pose a risk to the health and safety of the participants, the department or the California Department of Aging, as specified in the interagency agreement, may immediately take any of the following actions, including, but not limited to:

(1) Require a plan of correction, including as requested, a program plan pursuant to Section 14552.2.

(2) Limit participant enrollment.

(3) Prohibit new participant enrollment.

(c) The provider shall have the right to dispute an action taken under paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b). The department or the California Department of Aging, as specified in the interagency agreement, shall accept, consider, and resolve disputes filed pursuant to this subdivision in a timely manner. The dispute resolution process shall be determined by the California Department of Aging in consultation with the department.

(d) The director shall ensure that public records accurately reflect the current status of any potential actions including the resolution of disputes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 797, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14575.

Each adult day health care provider shall maintain a uniform accounting and reporting system as developed by the department, in consultation with the provider. The department shall implement a uniform cost accounting system and train providers in this system by July 1, 1987. The California Department of Aging, in coordination with the department may approve an alternative cost accounting system where the provider demonstrates the ability to report comparable and reliable data. The provider shall submit annual cost reports to the department, unless otherwise specified in an interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code, no later than five months after the close of the licensee’s fiscal year. The report shall be submitted in the format prescribed by the state. Each facility shall maintain, for a period of four years following the submission of annual cost reports, financial and statistical records of the period covered by the cost reports which are accurate and in sufficient detail to substantiate the cost data reported. These records shall be made available to state or federal representatives upon request. The department, unless otherwise specified in an interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code, may request a financial review performed by an independent certified public accountant as part of the provider’s annual cost report. All certified financial statements shall be filed with the department within a period no later than three months after the department’s request. The department, unless otherwise specified in an interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code, may require a limited or complete certified public accountant audit when the monitoring activities carried out pursuant to Section 14573 reveal significant financial management deficiencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 681, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14576.

Each adult day health care provider shall furnish to the department, unless otherwise specified by the interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code, all additional information and reports that the department may find necessary in performing its functions under this chapter. The information and reports shall include, but not be limited to, any statistical information regarding utilization of services, individual treatment plans and individual service reports, costs of health care, and administration the department may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 681, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14577.

All subcontracts for services reimbursable under this chapter shall be entered into pursuant to regulations of the department. All subcontracts shall be in writing, and a copy shall be transmitted to the department for approval prior to taking effect. Each subcontract submitted to the department for approval shall contain the amount of compensation or other consideration which the subcontractor will receive under the terms of the subcontract with the adult day health care provider. However, this section shall not apply to employment contracts of salaried employees of an adult day health care licensee.

All subcontracts to provide health care benefits, including emergency services, shall include a specification that services will be provided to participants to meet the needs of the participants based upon the plans of care. All subcontracts to provide any of the basic services specified in Section 14550 through subcontractors, shall meet all of the qualifications required by, or pursuant to, this chapter as appropriate for the services which the subcontractors are required to perform.

Each subcontract shall require that the subcontractor make all of its books and records pertaining to the goods or services furnished under the terms of the subcontract available for inspection, examination, or copying by the department during normal working hours at the subcontractor’s principal place of business, or at such other place in the state as the department shall designate. Subcontracts between an adult day health care provider and a subcontractor shall be public records and shall be kept on file and be available at the center. The names of the officers and stockholders of the subcontractor shall also be kept on file and be available as public records at the center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 151, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Conflict of Interest [14585. - 14588.]

14585.

For purposes of this article, “state officer or employee” means a Member of Congress representing the State of California; a Member of the Legislature; a secretary of a state agency and those members of the secretary’s staff who hold policymaking positions; those members of the Governor’s staff who hold policymaking positions; an administrative aide or committee consultant of the Legislature; the appointive or civil service employee of the highest class or grade in each department, system, program, section, or other administrative subdivision of the department and the California Department of Aging, as defined in regulations adopted by those departments; any other employee in the department and the California Department of Aging who has any responsibility for the negotiation and development, or management of Medi-Cal contracts of an adult day health care center certified under the provisions of this chapter. The director shall adopt regulations further delineating the class of employees covered by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 151, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14586.

No Medi-Cal certification for an adult day health center shall be approved or renewed pursuant to this chapter if a state officer or employee, or the spouse or a minor child of a state officer or employee, is a member of the board of directors, board of trustees, executive committee or other governing board or committee, the principal officer, a shareholder in the case of a corporation, or a partner in the case of a partnership, in any entity contracting with an adult day health center to provide services reimbursable pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1066.)
-------------------------------------------

14587.

No Medi-Cal certification for an adult day health center shall be approved or renewed if any state officer or employee has a direct financial interest in such a subcontractor.

For the purposes of this section, “direct financial interest” means the ownership of common stock, preferred stock, warrants, options, partnership interests, and debt instruments if convertible to equity investments in a subcontractor specified in this section. A convertible debt includes bonds, notes, debentures, and mortages. As used in this section, “direct financial interest” also includes such financial interest of a spouse or a minor child of a state officer or employee in any business entity or in real property held for income or gain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1066.)
-------------------------------------------

14588.

No Medi-Cal certification for an adult day health center shall be approved or renewed if a state officer or employee, or the spouse or a minor child of a state officer or employee, provides legal solicitation or management services to the adult day health center or shares in the income or any remuneration derived from the providing of legal or management services to an adult day health center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cessation of Adult Day Health Care and Assistance with Transition from Adult Day Health Care Services to Other Services [14589. - 14590.]

14589.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) During times of economic crisis, it is crucial to find areas within the program where efficiencies can be achieved while continuing to provide community-based services that support independence.

(2) Adult Day Health Care (ADHC) has been vulnerable to fraud and, despite attempts to curtail and prevent fraud, including, but not limited to, a moratorium on new facilities and onsite treatment authorization request review, fraud continues in this area.

(3) The state has added services and programs to enable vulnerable populations to remain in the community, including, but not limited
 to, the Money Follows the Person project, California’s Section 1115(a) Comprehensive Medi-Cal Demonstration Project Waiver: a Bridge to Reform, and services and supports, including day programs, provided under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)). It also continues to explore opportunities to add additional services and programs to help individuals remain in the community, including, but not limited to, pilot projects to better meet the health care needs of individuals dually eligible for both Medicare and Medicaid, and exploring the Community First Choice Option as a Medi-Cal benefit.

(4) There are alternative services to meet the needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries utilizing ADHC, including in-home supportive services, physical, occupational, and speech therapies, nonemergency medical transportation, and home health services.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature for the department to obtain federal approval to eliminate ADHC as an optional Medi-Cal benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 225.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14589.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law related to the Medi-Cal program or to adult day health care, adult day health care is excluded from coverage under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) This section shall only be implemented to the extent permitted by federal law.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(d) This section shall be implemented on the first day of the first calendar month following 90 days after the effective date of the act that adds this section or on the first day of the first calendar month following 60 days after the date the department secures all necessary federal approvals to implement this section, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 104.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.   Implementation is on date prescribed in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

14590.

(a) As a result of the enactment of this article to eliminate adult day health care as an optional benefit under the Medi-Cal program, the department shall implement a short-term program to fund organizations to assist individuals receiving ADHC services to transition to other Medi-Cal services, social services, and respite programs, or to provide social activities and respite assistance for individuals who were receiving ADHC services at the time the services were eliminated. The goal of this funding is to minimize the risk of institutionalization by identifying needed services available in the community and providing beneficiaries assistance in accessing those services.

(b) To ensure a smooth
 transition, adult day health care centers shall provide relevant participant information, including the most recent copy of a participant’s individual plan of care, to the department. Final Medi-Cal payment to adult day health care centers is contingent upon the provision of participants’ individual plan of care and all documentation supporting that individual plan of care, including medical records, to the grantee. Failure to provide documents under this section is grounds for a temporary withhold of payment to the adult day health care center under the process established pursuant to Section 14107.11.

(c) To implement this section, the department may contract with public or private entities and utilize existing health care service provider enrollment and payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary. Contracts entered into for the purposes of implementing this article, including any contract amendments, system
 changes pursuant to a change order, and any project or system development notices, may be developed using a competitive process established by the department and shall be exempt from Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 11545) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the Public Contract Code, and any associated policies, procedures, or regulations under those provisions, and shall be exempt from review or approval by any division of the Department of General Services and the California Technology Agency. A contract may provide for periodic advance payments for services to be performed.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this article
 through provider bulletins or similar instructions without taking regulatory action.

(e) Implementation of the short-term program to assist individuals receiving ADHC services to transition to other Medi-Cal services, social services, and respite programs, or to provide social activities and respite assistance for individuals who were receiving ADHC services at the time the services were eliminated, is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 104.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.75. Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly [14591. - 14594.]

14591.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Community-based services to the frail elderly are often uncoordinated, fragmented, inappropriate, or insufficient to meet the needs of frail elderly who are at risk of institutionalization, often resulting in unnecessary placement in nursing homes.

(b) Steadily increasing health care costs for the frail elderly provide incentive to develop programs providing quality services at reasonable costs.

(c) Capitated “risk-based” financing provides an alternative to the traditional fee-for-service payment system by providing a fixed, per capita monthly payment for a package of health care services and requiring the provider to assume financial responsibility for cost overruns.

(d) On Lok Senior Health Services began as a federal and state demonstration program in 1973 to test whether comprehensive community-based services could be provided to the frail elderly at no greater cost than nursing home care.

(e) Since 1983, On Lok Senior Health Services of San Francisco has successfully provided a comprehensive package of services and operated within a cost-effective, capitated risk-based financing system.

(f) Recognizing On Lok’s success, Congress passed legislation in 1986 and 1987 encouraging the expansion of capitated long-term care programs by permitting federal Medicare and Medicaid waivers to be granted indefinitely to On Lok and authorizing the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) to grant waivers in up to 10 new sites throughout the nation in order to replicate the On Lok model.

(g) In response, the Legislature authorized the State Department of Health Care Services to seek a waiver to contract with up to 10 demonstration projects to develop risk-based, long-term care pilot programs modeled upon On Lok Senior Health Services.

(h) The demonstration projects authorized by the Legislature proved to be successful at providing
 comprehensive, community-based services to frail elderly individuals at no greater cost than providing nursing home care.

(i) In 1997, Congress passed the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) authorizing states to offer PACE program services as optional services under the state’s Medicaid state plan.

(j) Based upon the success of the demonstration projects in California, the state is now providing community-based, risk-based, and capitated long-term care services under the PACE program as optional services under California’s Medi-Cal State Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 367, Sec. 19.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14592.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “PACE organization” means an entity as defined in Section 460.6 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The director shall establish the California Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE program) to provide community-based, risk-based, and capitated long-term care services as optional services under the state’s Medi-Cal State Plan and under contracts entered into between the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department, and PACE organizations, meeting the requirements of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and any other applicable law or regulation.

(c) A primary care clinic, as defined in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code, an adult day health care center, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code, or a home health agency, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1727 of the Health and Safety Code, that exclusively serves PACE participants, as defined in Section 460.6 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, is exempt from licensure by the State Department of Public Health. A primary care clinic, an adult day health care center, or a home health agency that exclusively serves PACE participants shall be overseen and regulated by the department.

(1) A primary care clinic, adult day health care center, or home health agency approved by the department pursuant to this section to operate exclusively as part of a PACE organization may provide services
 to individuals who are being assessed for eligibility to enroll in the PACE program for not more than 60 calendar days after an individual submits an application for enrollment.

(2) If the department determines that a primary care clinic, adult day health care center, or home health agency approved to operate exclusively as part of a PACE organization has provided services to individuals other than those enrolled in the PACE program, or who are being assessed for eligibility pursuant to paragraph (1), the clinic, adult day health care center, or home health agency shall apply for licensure with the State Department of Public Health. A primary care clinic, adult day health care center, or home health agency required to obtain licensure from the State Department of Public Health pursuant to this paragraph shall apply for the license not later
 than 60 calendar days following the determination by the department described in this paragraph. The clinic, adult day health care center, or home health agency shall not accept any new participants in the PACE program until licensure is obtained.

(3) This subdivision shall become operative only if the director determines, and communicates that determination in writing to the State Department of Public Health, that operating standards compliance programs consistent with subdivisions (d) and (e) have been established for implementation of this section. A primary care clinic, adult day health care center, or home health agency, as defined in this subdivision, shall remain under the oversight and regulatory authority of the State Department of Public Health until the director communicates their written determination to the State Department of
 Public Health.

(d) In order to provide services to PACE participants, PACE organizations exempt from licensure pursuant to this section shall be in compliance with all of the operating standards:

(1) A primary care clinic that exclusively serves PACE participants, or that also serves individuals who are being assessed for eligibility to enroll in a PACE program for not more than 60 calendar days after an individual submits an application for enrollment, shall be in compliance with the clinic operating standards set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, except as modified by the department, to meet the needs of PACE participants or those individuals being assessed.

(2) An adult day health care center that exclusively serves PACE participants, or that also serves individuals who are being assessed for eligibility to enroll in a PACE program for not more than 60 calendar days after an individual submits an application for enrollment, shall be in compliance with the center operating standards set forth in Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, except as modified by the department, to meet the needs of PACE participants or those individuals being assessed.

(3) A home health agency that exclusively serves PACE participants, or that also serves individuals who are being assessed for eligibility to enroll in a PACE program for not more than 60 calendar days after an individual submits an application for enrollment, shall be in compliance with the
 agency operating standards set forth in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1725) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, except as modified by the department, to meet the needs of PACE participants or those individuals being assessed.

(e) A PACE organization exempt from licensure pursuant to this section shall cooperate with the department’s evaluation, oversight, and ongoing monitoring and shall comply with the operating standards, as described in subdivision (d). The PACE organization’s cooperation shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Permitting the department or its agent immediate access to inspect any physical locations involved with the PACE organization’s services.

(2) Immediately providing the department or its agent with copies of any requested records regarding the PACE organization and services offered to PACE participants.

(3) Immediately providing the department or its agent with requested information regarding the PACE organization’s operations.

(f) (1) Before approving an adult day health care center that exclusively serves PACE participants, or that also serves individuals who are being assessed for eligibility to enroll in a
 PACE program for not more than 60 calendar days after an individual submits an application for enrollment, the department shall obtain a criminal record clearance for the administrator, program director, and fiscal officer of the proposed adult day health care center. The department shall obtain the criminal record clearances each time these positions are to be filled. The adult day health care center facility shall not allow a newly hired administrator, program director, or fiscal officer to have direct contact with clients or residents of the facility before completion of the criminal record clearance set forth in this subdivision.

(2) The criminal record clearance shall require the administrator, program director, and fiscal officer to submit electronic fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice
 to the Department of Justice, for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions, state or federal arrests, and state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(3) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the department.

(4) The Department of Justice shall provide a
 state-level or federal-level criminal offender record information search response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(5) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in paragraph (1).

(6) The persons described in paragraph (1) shall be responsible for any costs associated with transmitting the electronic fingerprint images. The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this subdivision.

(7) A criminal record clearance shall be complete when the department has
 obtained the person’s criminal offender record information search response from the Department of Justice and has determined that the person is not disqualified from engaging in the activity for which clearance is required.

(8) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide an individual with a copy of their state-level or federal-level criminal offender record information search response as provided to the department by the Department of Justice if the department has denied a criminal background clearance based on that response and the individual makes a written request to the department for a copy specifying an address to which it is to be sent. The state-level or federal-level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice and
 shall be provided to the address specified by the individual in the written request. The department shall retain a copy of the individual’s written request and the response and date provided.

(g) (1) To qualify for approval as a home health agency that exclusively serves PACE participants, or that also serves individuals who are being assessed for eligibility to enroll in a PACE program for not more than 60 calendar days after an individual submits an application for enrollment, the following persons shall submit electronic fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice to the Department of Justice for the furnishing of the person’s criminal record to the department, at the person’s expense as provided in paragraph (6), for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence
 and content of a record of state or federal convictions, state or federal arrests, and state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal:

(A) The owner or owners of a private agency if the owners are individuals.

(B) If the owner of a private agency is a corporation, partnership, or association, an individual with a 10 percent or greater interest in that corporation, partnership, or association.

(C) The administrator.

(2) A facility shall not allow a newly hired administrator, program director, or fiscal officer to have direct contact with clients or
 residents of the facility before completion of the criminal record clearance process set forth in this subdivision.

(3) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the department.

(4) The Department of Justice shall provide a state-level or federal-level criminal offender record information search response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(5) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in paragraph (1).

(6) The persons described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be responsible for any costs associated with transmitting the electronic fingerprint images. The fee to cover the processing costs of the Department of Justice, not including the costs associated with capturing or transmitting the fingerprint images and related information, shall not exceed thirty-two dollars ($32) per submission.

(7) A criminal record clearance shall be complete when the department has obtained the person’s criminal offender record information search response from the Department of Justice and has
 determined that the person is not disqualified from engaging in the activity for which clearance is required.

(h) The department may refuse to enter into, or may terminate, a contract with a PACE organization exempt from licensure pursuant to this section, based on the PACE organization’s failure to comply with the operating standards as described in subdivision (d), or based on the PACE organization’s failure to cooperate as described in subdivision (e).

(i) If a PACE organization exempt from licensure pursuant to this section fails to comply with subdivision (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g), the department may require the PACE organization to submit a corrective action plan to bring the PACE organization into compliance with the requirements of those subdivisions. If the department
 approves the corrective action plan, the PACE organization shall complete the corrective action plan to the satisfaction of the department. If the PACE organization fails to satisfactorily complete the corrective action plan within the time specified by the department, the department may take other action as specified in the PACE organization’s contract with the department.

(j) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or may amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt
 from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of letters, bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(l) This section shall be implemented only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(m) The department shall implement the amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision no later than January 1, 2021, but only to the extent any necessary
 federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(n) (1) The department shall establish an administrative fee to be paid by each PACE organization exempt from licensure upon enrollment as a PACE provider, and annually thereafter, in an amount necessary to pay for reasonable costs of implementing and administering subdivisions (c) to (l), inclusive.

(2) (A) The fee described in this subdivision shall not be greater than the corresponding fee or fees otherwise imposed on a primary care clinic, home health agency, or adult day health care center pursuant to laws and regulations relating to licensing and regulation by the State Department of Public Health.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the fee described in this subdivision is not an additional cost to a PACE organization because PACE organizations exempt from licensure are not subject to fees otherwise imposed for purposes of licensing and regulation by the State Department of Public Health.

(C) All fees paid to, and received by, the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the State Treasury and shall be credited to a special fund that is hereby created as the PACE Oversight Fund of the State Department of Health Care Services. Moneys deposited in this fund shall be expended by the department for the purposes of implementing and administering subdivisions (c) to (l), inclusive, upon appropriation by the Legislature. No surplus in the PACE Oversight Fund of the State Department of Health Care
 Services shall be deposited in, or transferred to, the General Fund or any other fund.

(o) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall be supported entirely by federal funds and special funds, unless otherwise specified in statute or unless specifically appropriated from the General Fund in the annual Budget Act or other enacted legislation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 12.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14593.

(a) (1) The department may enter into contracts with public or private organizations for implementation of the PACE program, and also may enter into separate contracts with PACE organizations, to fully implement the single state agency responsibilities assumed by the department in those contracts, Section 14132.94, and any other state requirement found necessary by the department to provide comprehensive community-based, risk-based, and capitated long-term care services to California’s frail elderly.

(2) The department may enter into separate contracts as specified in paragraph (1) with up to 15 PACE organizations. This paragraph shall become inoperative upon federal approval of a capitation rate methodology, pursuant to subdivision (n) of
 Section 14301.1.

(b) The requirements of the PACE model, as provided for pursuant to Section 1894 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395eee) and Section 1934 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-4) of the federal Social Security Act, shall not be waived or modified. The requirements that shall not be waived or modified include all of the following:

(1) The focus on frail elderly qualifying individuals who require the level of care provided in a nursing facility.

(2) The delivery of comprehensive, integrated acute and long-term care services.

(3) The interdisciplinary team approach to care management and service delivery.

(4) Capitated, integrated financing that allows the provider to pool payments received from public and
 private programs and individuals.

(5) The assumption by the provider of full financial risk.

(6) The provision of a PACE benefit package for all participants, regardless of source of payment, that shall include all of the following:

(A) All Medicare-covered items and services.

(B) All Medicaid-covered items and services, as specified in the state’s Medicaid plan.

(C) Other services determined necessary by the interdisciplinary team to improve and maintain the participant’s overall health status.

(c) Sections 14002, 14005.12, 14005.17, and 14006 shall apply when determining the eligibility for Medi-Cal of a person receiving
 the services from an organization providing services under this chapter.

(d) Provisions governing the treatment of income and resources of a married couple, for the purposes of determining the eligibility of a nursing-facility certifiable or institutionalized spouse, shall be established so as to qualify for federal financial participation.

(e) (1) The department shall establish capitation rates paid to each PACE organization at no less than 95 percent of the fee-for-service equivalent cost, including the department’s cost of administration, that the department estimates would be payable for all services covered under the PACE organization contract if all those services were to be furnished to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program provided for pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

(2) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative upon federal approval of a capitation rate methodology, pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 14301.1.

(f) Contracts under this chapter may be on a nonbid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), and only to the extent federal financial participation is available, the department, in consultation with PACE organizations, shall seek increased federal regulatory flexibility from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to modernize the PACE
 program, which may include, but is not limited to, addressing all of the following:

(A) Composition of PACE interdisciplinary teams (IDT).
